District of Columbia statutes.
4-111

Supervision over institutions supported by congressional appropriations.

The said Board of Public Welfare shall visit, inspect, and maintain a general supervision over all institutions, societies, or associations of a charitable, eleemosynary, correctional, or reformatory character which are supported in whole or in part by appropriations of Congress, made for the care or treatment of residents of the District of Columbia; and no payment shall be made to any such charitable, eleemosynary, correctional, or reformatory institution for any resident of the District of Columbia who is not received and maintained therein pursuant to the rules established by such Board of Public Welfare, except in the case of persons committed by the courts, or abandoned infants needing immediate care.

June 6, 1900, 31 Stat. 664, ch. 807
Mar. 16, 1926, 44 Stat. 210, ch. 58, § 10
Board of Public Welfare abolished: See note to § 4-102.
1973 Ed., § 3-111.
1981 Ed., § 3-111.